test/data/inspect/acrosuff.regex
[[? - "<CORR>"]*]
.o.
[
    ["-" e ]      (->) [ 0         "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    ["-" e n]     (->) [ ":" n     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    ["-"   n]     (->) [ ":" n     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    ["-" e s n e] (->) [ ":" s n e "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    ["-" e s e]   (->) [ ":" s e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    ["-"   s e]   (->) [ ":" s e   "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    ["-" e m]     (->) [ ":" m     "<CORR>"]::30 ,
    ["-"   m]     (->) [ ":" m     "<CORR>"]::30 
    || _ .#.
]
.o.
[ [? - "<CORR>"]*  "<CORR>":0  [? - "<CORR>"]* ];
